epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/ru.xml
		5чя
		шаг1н
		6ш1б
		ш5ви
		ш5вь
		ш5г
		6ш5д
		ше5вр
		шек1
		шекс2
		шео2
		ше2п1т
		1ши
		2шиб
		ш1к
		ш2кив
		шк5н
		1ш2кол
		1шлю
		ш1ля
		ш1м
		ш1н
		ш5ни
		1шпе
		1шпил
		ш2пр
		ш1с
		1ште
		1штр
		1шту
		1шты
		2ш1ф
		ш1ц
		ш1ч
		ш1ш
		5шы
		6шь.
		шья2
		ш5э6
		1шю
		ще1с
		1щи
		2щ1н
		щ1с
		щ1щ
		5щя
		ъ1
		ъе2
		ъ2ел
		ъем5н
		ъ6с
		ъ6щ
		ъю2
		ъя2
		ы1а
		ы1ба
		ы1бе
		ы1би
		ы1бла
		ы1бле
		ы1бли
		ы1бло
		ы1блу
		ы1блы
		ы1бо
		ы1бра
		ы1бре
		ы1бри
		ы1бро
		ы1бру
		ы1бры
		ы1бу
		ы1бы
		ы1бье
		ы1бьи
		ы1бью
		ы1бья
		ы1бю
		ы1бя
		ы1ва
		ы1ве
		ы1ви
		ы1вла
		ы1вле
		ы1вли
		ы1вло
		ы1влу
		ы1влы
		ы1во
		ы6в5п
		ы1вра
		ы1вре
		ы1ври
		ы1вро
		ы1вру
		ы1вры
		ы1ву
		ы1вы
		ы1вье
		ы1вьи
		ы1вью
		ы1вья
		ы1вю
		ы1вя
		ы1г
		ы1га
		ы1ге
		ы1ги
		ы1гла
		ы1гле
		ы1гли
		ы1гло
		ы1глу
		ы1глы
		ы1го
		ы1гра
		ы1гре
		ы1гри
		ы1гро
		ы1гру
		ы1гры
		ы1гу
		ы1гы
		ы1гье
		ы1гьи
		ы1гью
		ы1гья
		ы1гю
		ы1гя
		ы1да
		ы1два
		ы1две
		ы1дви
		ы1дво
		ы1дву
		ы1двы
		ы1де
		ы1ди
		ы1дла
		ы1дле
		ы1дли
		ы1дло
		ы1длу
		ы1длы
		ы1до
		ы5др
		ы1дра
		ы1дре
		ы1дри
		ы1дро
		ы1дру
		ы1дры
		ы1ду
		ы1ды
		ы1дье
		ы1дьи
		ы1дью
		ы1дья
		ы1дю
		ы1дя
		ы1е2
		ы1жа
		ы1же
		ы1жж
		ы1жи
		ы1жм
		ы1жо
		ы1жр
		ы1жу
		ы1жье
		ы1жьи
		ы1жью
		ы1жья
		ы1за
		ы1зв
		ы1зд
		ы1зе
		ы1зи
		ы1зо
		ы1зр
		ы1зу
		ы1зы
		ы1зье
		ы1зьи
		ы1зью
		ы1зья
		ы1зю
		ы1зя
		ы1и2
		ы1ка
		ы1ква
		ы1кве
		ы1кви
		ы1кво
		ы1кву
		ы1квы
		ы1ке
		ы1ки
		ы1кла
		ы1кле
		ы1кли
		ы1кло
		ы1клу
		ы1клы
		ык1н
		ы1ко
		ы1кра
		ы1кре
		ы1кри
		ы1кро
		ы1кру
		ы1кры
		ы1ку
		ы1кы
		ы1кье
		ы1кьи
		ы1кью
		ы1кья
		ы1кю
		ы1кя
		ы1ла
		ы1ле3
		ы1ли
		ы1ло
		ы1лу
		ы1лы
		ы1лье
		ы1льи
		ы1лью
		ы1лья
		ы1лю
		ы1ля
		ы1ма
		ы1ме
		ы1ми
		ы1мла
		ы1мле
		ы1мли
		ы1мло
		ы1млу
		ы1млы
		ы1мо
		ы1мра
		ы1мре
		ы1мри
		ы1мро
		ы1мру
		ы1мры
		ы1му
		ым1ч
		ы1мы6
		ымыш5
		ы1мье
		ы1мьи
		ы1мью
		ы1мья
		ы1мю
		ы1мя
		ы1на
		ы1не
		ы1ни
		ы1но
		ы1нра
		ы1нре
		ы1нри
		ы1нро
		ы1нру
		ы1нры
		ы1ну
		ы1ны
		ы1нье
		ы1ньи
		ы1нью
		ы1нья
		ы1ню
		ы1ня
		ы1о
		ы1па
		ы1пе
		ы1пи
		ы1пла
		ы1пле
		ы1пли
		ы1пло
		ы1плу
		ы1плы
		ы1по
		ыпол1з2л
		ы1пра
		ы1пре
		ы1при
		ы1про
		ы1пру
		ы1пры
		ы1пта
		ы1пте
		ы1пти
		ы1пто
		ы1пту
		ы1пты
		ы1пу
		ы1пы
		ы1пье
		ы1пьи
		ы1пью
		ы1пья
		ы1пю
		ы1пя
		ы1ра
		ы1рв
		ы1ре
		ыре2х5
		ы1ри
		ы1ро
		ы1ру
		ы1ры
		ы1рье
		ы1рьи
		ы1рью
		ы1рья
		ы1рю
		ы1ря
		ы1са
		ы1сва
		ы1све
		ы1сви
		ы1сво
		ы1сву
		ы1свы
		ы1се
		ы1си
		ы1сква
		ы1скве
		ы1скви
		ы1скво
		ы1скву
		ы1сквы
		ыс5ки
		ы1скра
		ы1скре
		ы1скри
		ы1скро
		ы1скру
		ы1скры
		ыс5ку
		ы5см
		ы1со
		ыс6па
		ыс6пл
		ы1сра
		ы1сре
		ы1сри
		ы1сро
		ы1сру
		ы1сры
		ы1ста
		ы1ства
		ы1стве
		ы1стви
		ы1ство
		ы1ству
		ы1ствы
		ы1ствье
		ы1ствьи
		ы1ствью
		ы1ствья
		ы1ствю
		ы1ствя
		ы1сте
		ы1сти
		ы1сто
		ы1стра
		ы1стре
		ы1стри
		ы1стро
		ы1стру
		ы1стры
		ы1стрье
		ы1стрьи
		ы1стрью
		ы1стрья
		ы1стрю
		ы1стря
		ы1сту
		ы1сты
		ы1стье
		ы1стьи
		ы1стью
		ы1стья
		ы1стю
		ы1стя
		ы1су
		ы1сы
		ы1сье
		ы1сьи
		ы1сью
		ы1сья
		ы1сю
		ы1ся
		ы1та
		ы1тва
		ы1тве
		ы1тви
		ы1тво
		ы1тву
		ы1твы
		ы1те
		ы1ти
		ы1то
		ы5тр
		ы1тра
		ы1тре
		ы1три
		ы1тро
		ы1тру
		ы1тры
		ы1ту
		ы1ты
		ы1тье
		ы1тьи
		ы1тью
		ы1тья
		ы1тю
		ы1тя
		ы1у2
		ы1фа
		ы1фе
		ы1фи
		ы1фла
		ы1фле
		ы1фли
		ы1фло
		ы1флу
		ы1флы
		ы1фо
		ы1фра
		ы1фре
		ы1фри
		ы1фро
		ы1фру
		ы1фры
		ы1фу
		ы1фье
		ы1фьи
		ы1фью
		ы1фья
		ы1фю
		ы1фя
		ы1ха
		ы1хда
		ы1хде
		ы1хди
		ы1хдо
		ы1хду
		ы1хды
		ы1хе
		ы1хи
		ы1хо
		ы1ху
		ы1хы
		ы1хье
		ы1хьи
		ы1хью
		ы1хья
		ы1хю
		ы1хя
		ы1ца
		ы1це
		ы1ци
		ы1цо
		ы1цу
		ы1цы
		ы1цье
		ы1цьи
		ы1цью
		ы1цья
		ы1ча
		ы1че
		ы1чи
		ы5чл
		ы1чу
		ы1чье
		ы1чьи
		ы1чью
		ы1чья
		ы1ша
		ы1шва
		ы1шве
		ы1шви
		ы1шво
		ы1шву
		ы1швы
		ы1ше
		ы1ши
		ы1шла
		ы1шле
		ы1шли
		ы1шло
		ы1шлу
		ы1шлы
		ы1шо
		ы1шра
		ы1шре
		ы1шри
		ы1шро
		ы1шру
		ы1шры
		ы1шу
		ы1шье
		ы1шьи
		ы1шью
		ы1шья
		ы1ща
		ы1ще
		ы1щи
		ы1що
		ы1щу
		ы1щье
		ы1щьи
		ы1щью
		ы1щья
		ы1ы
		ы1э
		ы1ю
		ы1я2
		ь1б
		ьби5
		ь1ва
		ь1ве
		ь1ви
		ь1г
		ь1де
		ь1дж
		ь1ди
		ь5дор
		ьдо5с6
		ь5др
		ь5ду
		ь5дя
		ь1ж
		ь1з
		ь6зя.
		ь1к
		ьк5в
		ь2к1ло
		ьк5н
		ь1л
		ь1м
		ь1н
		ь2нул
		ь1п
		ь1р
		ь1с
		ь2сн
		ь2сти
		ьс1тин
		ь1т
		ь2т1в
		ь1ф
		ь6ф5ра
		ь1х
		ьхо2з1
		ь1цз
		ь1ч
		ь1ш
		ь6шк
		ь1щ
		ь6ща
		ь2ще
		ь6щу
		ь1э
		ья6ви
		э1а
		э5ва
		э6вт
		э2д
		2э1е
		э5зе
		э5зи
		э1и
		2эй
		эк2з
		экс1
		э5лы
		эль5
		э1ля
		1эм
		э1о
		э6п
		э5ри
		эс1к
		эс5м
		эс2па
		эс6т
		э1у
		э6ф
		э5цз
		э1ы
		э1э
		э1ю
		2э1я
		ю1а
		ю1ба
		юб2в
		ю1бе
		ю1би
		ю1бла
		ю1бле
		ю1бли
		ю1бло
		ю1блу
		ю1блы
		ю1бо
		ю1бра
		ю1бре
		ю1бри
		ю1бро
		ю1бру
		ю1бры
		ю1бу
		ю1бы
		ю1бье
		ю1бьи
		ю1бью
		ю1бья
		ю1бю
		ю1бя
		ю1ва
		ю1ве
		ю1ви
		ю1вла
		ю1вле
		ю1вли
		ю1вло
		ю1влу
		ю1влы
		ю1во
		ю1вра
		ю1вре
		ю1ври
		ю1вро
		ю1вру
		ю1вры
		ю1ву
		ю1вы
		ю1вье
		ю1вьи
		ю1вью
		ю1вья
		ю1вю
		ю1вя
		ю1га
		ю1ге
		ю1ги
		ю1гла
		ю1гле
		ю1гли
		ю1гло
		ю1глу
		ю1глы
		юг1н
		ю1го
		ю1гра
		ю1гре
		ю1гри
		ю1гро
		ю1гру
		ю1гры
		ю1гу
		ю1гы
		ю1гье
		ю1гьи
		ю1гью
		ю1гья
		ю1гю
		ю1гя
		ю1да
		ю1два
		ю1две
		ю1дви
		ю1дво
		ю1дву
		ю1двы
		ю1де
		юд1ж
		ю1ди
		ю1дла
		ю1дле
		ю1дли
		ю1дло
		ю1длу
		ю1длы
		ю1до
		ю1дра
		ю1дре
		ю1дри
		ю1дро
		ю1дру
		ю1дры
		ю1ду
		ю1ды
		ю1дье
		ю1дьи
		ю1дью
		ю1дья
		ю1дю
		ю1дя
		ю1е
		ю1жа
		ю1же
		ю1жи
		ю1жо
		ю1жу
		ю1жье
		ю1жьи
		ю1жью
		ю1жья
		ю1за
		ю1зе
		ю1зи
		ю1зо
		ю1зу
		ю1зы
		ю1зье
		ю1зьи
		ю1зью
		ю1зья
		ю1зю
		ю1зя
		ю1и
		юй2д1
		юйдо6
		ю1ка
		ю1ква
		ю1кве
		ю1кви
		ю1кво
		ю1кву
		ю1квы
		ю1ке
		ю1ки
		ю1кла
		ю1кле
		ю1кли
		ю1кло
		ю1клу
		ю1клы
		юк1н
		ю1ко
		ю1кра
		ю1кре
		ю1кри
		ю1кро
		ю1кру
		ю1кры
		ю1ку
		ю1кы
		ю1кье
		ю1кьи
		ю1кью
		ю1кья
		ю1кю
		ю1кя
		ю1ла
		ю1ле
		ю1ли
		ю1ло
		ю1лу
		ю1лы
		ю1лье
		ю1льи
		ю1лью
		ю1лья
		ю1лю
		ю1ля
		2юм
		ю1ма
		ю1ме
		ю1ми
		юмини5
		ю1мла
		ю1мле
		ю1мли
		ю1мло
		ю1млу
		ю1млы
		ю1мо
		ю1мра
		ю1мре
		ю1мри
		ю1мро
		ю1мру
		ю1мры
		ю1му
		ю1мы
		ю1мье
		ю1мьи
		ю1мью
		ю1мья
		ю1мю
		ю1мя
		ю1на
		ю1не
		ю1ни
		ю1но
		ю1нра
		ю1нре
		ю1нри
		ю1нро
		ю1нру
		ю1нры
		ю1ну
		ю1ны
		ю1нье
		ю1ньи
		ю1нью
		ю1нья
		ю1ню
		ю1ня
		ю1о
		ю1па
		ю1пе
		ю1пи
		ю1пла
		ю1пле
		ю1пли
		ю1пло
		ю1плу
		ю1плы
		ю1по
		ю1пра
		ю1пре
		ю1при
		ю1про
		ю1пру
		ю1пры
		ю6п5т
		ю1пта
		ю1пте
		ю1пти
		ю1пто
		ю1пту
		ю1пты
		ю1пу
		ю1пы
		ю1пье
		ю1пьи
		ю1пью
		ю1пья
		ю1пю
		ю1пя
		ю1ра
		ю1ре
		ю1ри
		ю1ро
		ю1ру
		ю1ры
		ю1рье
		ю1рьи
		ю1рью
		ю1рья
		ю1рю
		ю1ря
		ю1са
		ю1сва
		ю1све
		ю1сви
		ю1сво
		ю1сву
		ю1свы
		ю1се
		ю1си
		юс5к
		ю1сква
		ю1скве
		ю1скви
		ю1скво
		ю1скву
		ю1сквы
		ю1скра
		ю1скре
		ю1скри
		ю1скро
		ю1скру
		ю1скры
		ю1со
		ю1сра
		ю1сре
		ю1сри
		ю1сро
		ю1сру
		ю1сры
		ю1ста
		ю1ства
		ю1стве
		ю1стви
		ю1ство
		ю1ству
		ю1ствы
		ю1ствье
		ю1ствьи
		ю1ствью
		ю1ствья
		ю1ствю
		ю1ствя
		ю1сте
		ю1сти
		ю1сто
		ю1стра
		ю1стре
		ю1стри
		ю1стро
		ю1стру
		ю1стры
		ю1стрье
		ю1стрьи
		ю1стрью
		ю1стрья
		ю1стрю
		ю1стря
		ю1сту
		ю1сты
		ю1стье
		ю1стьи
		ю1стью
		ю1стья
		ю1стю
		ю1стя
		ю1су
		ю1сы
		ю1сье
		ю1сьи
		ю1сью
		ю1сья
		ю1сю
		ю1ся
		ю1та
		ю1тва
		ю1тве
		ю1тви
		ю1тво
		ю1тву
		ю1твы
		ю1те
		ю1ти
		ю1то
		ю1тра
		ю1тре
		ю1три
		ю1тро
		ю1тру
		ю1тры
		ю1ту
		ю1ты
		ю1тье
		ю1тьи
		ю1тью
		ю1тья
		ю1тю
		ю1тя
		ю1у
		ю1фа
		ю1фе
		ю1фи
		ю1фла
		ю1фле
		ю1фли
		ю1фло
		ю1флу
		ю1флы
		ю1фо
		ю1фра
		ю1фре
		ю1фри
		ю1фро
		ю1фру
		ю1фры
		ю1фу
		ю1фье
		ю1фьи
		ю1фью
		ю1фья
		ю1фю
		ю1фя
		ю1ха
		ю1хда
		ю1хде
		ю1хди
		ю1хдо
		ю1хду
		ю1хды
		ю1хе
		ю1хи
		ю1хо
		ю1ху
		ю1хы
		ю1хье
		ю1хьи
		ю1хью
		ю1хья
		ю1хю
		ю1хя
		ю1ца
		ю1це
		ю1ци
		ю1цо
		ю1цу
		ю1цы
		ю1цье
		ю1цьи
		ю1цью
		ю1цья
		ю1ча
		ю1че
		ю1чи
		ю1чу
		ю1чье
		ю1чьи
		ю1чью
		ю1чья
		ю1ша
		ю1шва
		ю1шве
		ю1шви
		ю1шво
		ю1шву
		ю1швы
		ю1ше
		ю1ши
		ю1шла
		ю1шле
		ю1шли
		ю1шло
		ю1шлу
		ю1шлы
		ю1шо
		ю1шра
		ю1шре
		ю1шри
		ю1шро
		ю1шру
		ю1шры
		ю1шу
		ю1шье
		ю1шьи
		ю1шью
		ю1шья
		ю5щ
		ю1ща
		ю1ще
		ю1щи
		ю1що
		ю1щу
		ю1щье
		ю1щьи
		ю1щью
		ю1щья
		ю1ы
		ю1э
		ю1ю
		ю1я
		я1а
		я1ба
		я1бе
		я1би
		я1бла
		я1бле
		я1бли
		я1бло
		я1блу
		я1блы
		я1бо
		я1бра
		я1бре
		я1бри
		я1бро
		я1бру
		я1бры
		я1бу
		я1бы
		я1бье
		я1бьи
		я1бью
		я1бья
		я1бю
		я1бя
		я1ва
		я1ве
		5я1ви
		я2вл
		я1вла
		я1вле
		я1вли
		я1вло
		я1влу
		я1влы
		я1во
		я1вра
		я1вре
		я1ври
		я1вро
		я1вру
		я1вры
		я1ву
		я1вы
		я1вье
		я1вьи
		я1вью
		я1вья
		я1вю
		я1вя
		я1га
		я1ге
		я1ги
		я1гла
		я1гле
		я1гли
		я1гло
		я1глу
		я1глы
		яг5н
		я1го
		я1гра
		я1гре
		я1гри
		я1гро
		я1гру
		я1гры
		я1гу
		я1гы
		я1гье
		я1гьи
		я1гью
		я1гья
		я1гю
		я1гя
		я1да
		я1два
		я1две
		я1дви
		я1дво
		я1дву
		я1двы
		я1де
		я1ди
		я1дла
		я1дле
		я1дли
		я1дло
		я1длу
		я1длы
		я1до
		я1дра
		я1дре
		я1дри
		я1дро
		я1дру
		я1дры
		я1ду
		я1ды
		я1дье
		я1дьи
		я1дью
		я1дья
		я1дю
		я1дя
		я1е
		я1жа
		я1же
		я1жи
		я1жо
		я1жу
		я1жье
		я1жьи
		я1жью
		я1жья
		я1за
		яз1в
		я1зе
		я1зи
		я1зо
		я1зу
		я1зы
		я1зье
		я1зьи
		я1зью
		я1зья
		я1зю
		я1зя
		я1и
		я1ка
		я1ква
		я1кве
		я1кви
		я1кво
		я1кву
		я1квы
		я1ке
		я1ки
		я1кла
		я1кле
		я1кли
		я1кло
		я1клу
		я1клы
		як1н
		я1ко
		я1кра
		я1кре
		я1кри
		я1кро
		я1кру
		я1кры
		я1ку
		я1кы
		я1кье
		я1кьи
		я1кью
		я1кья
		я1кю
		я1кя
		я1ла
		я1ле
		я1ли
		я1ло
		я1лу
		я1лы
		я1лье
		я1льи
		я1лью
		я1лья
		я1лю
		я1ля
		я1ма
		я1ме
		я1ми
		я1мла
		я1мле
		я1мли
		я1мло
		я1млу
		я1млы
		я1мо
		я1мра
		я1мре
		я1мри
		я1мро
		я1мру
		я1мры
		я1му
		я1мы
		я1мье
		я1мьи
		я1мью
		я1мья
		я1мю
		я1мя
		я1на
		я1не
		я1ни
		я1но
		я1нра
		я1нре
		я1нри
		я1нро
		я1нру
		я1нры
		я1ну
		я1ны
		я1нье
		я1ньи
		я1нью
		я1нья
		я1ню
		я1ня
		я1о2
		я1па
		я1пе
		я1пи
		я1пла
		я1пле
		я1пли
		я1пло
		я1плу
		я1плы
		я1по
		я1пра
		я1пре
		я1при
		я1про
		я1пру
		я1пры
		я1пта
		я1пте
		я1пти
		я1пто
		я1пту
		я1пты
		я1пу
		я1пы
		я1пье
		я1пьи
		я1пью
		я1пья
		я1пю
		я1пя
		я1ра
		яр5в
		я1ре
		я1ри
		я1ро
		я1ру
		я1ры
		я1рье
		я1рьи
		я1рью
		я1рья
		я1рю
		я1ря
		я1са
		я1сва
		я1све
		я1сви
		я1сво
		я1сву
		я1свы
		я1се
		я1си
		яс1к
		я1сква
		я1скве
		я1скви
		я1скво
		я1скву
		я1сквы
		я1скра
		я1скре
		я1скри
		я1скро
		я1скру
		я1скры
		я1со
		я1сра
		я1сре
		я1сри
		я1сро
		я1сру
		я1сры
		яс6т
		я1ста
		я1ства
		я1стве
		я1стви
		я1ство
		я1ству
		я1ствы
		я1ствье
		я1ствьи
		я1ствью
		я1ствья
		я1ствю
		я1ствя
		я1сте
		я1сти
		я1сто
		я1стра
		я1стре
		я1стри
		я1стро
		я1стру
		я1стры
		я1стрье
		я1стрьи
		я1стрью
		я1стрья
		я1стрю
		я1стря
		я1сту
		я1сты
		я1стье
		я1стьи
		я1стью
		я1стья
		я1стю
		я1стя
		я1су
		я1сы
		я1сье
		я1сьи
		я1сью
		я1сья
		я1сю
		я1ся
		я1та
		я1тва
		я1тве
		я1тви
		я1тво
		я1тву
		я1твы
		я1те
		я3ти
		я1то
		я1тра
		я1тре
		я1три
		я1тро
		я1тру
		я1тры
		я1ту
		я1ты
		я1тье
		я1тьи
		я1тью
		я1тья
		я1тю
		я1тя
		я1у
		я1фа
		я1фе
		я1фи
		я1фла
		я1фле
		я1фли
		я1фло
		я1флу
		я1флы
		я1фо
		я1фра
		я1фре
		я1фри
		я1фро
		я1фру
		я1фры
		я1фу
		я1фье
		я1фьи
		я1фью
		я1фья
		я1фю
		я1фя
		я1ха
		я1хда
		я1хде
		я1хди
		я1хдо
		я1хду
		я1хды
		я1хе
		я1хи
		я1хо
		я1ху
		я1хы
		я1хье
		я1хьи
		я1хью
		я1хья
		я1хю
		я1хя
		я1ца
		я1це
		я1ци
		я1цо
		я1цу
		я1цы
		я1цье
		я1цьи
		я1цью
		я1цья
		я1ча
		я1че
		я1чи
		я1чу
		я1чье
		я1чьи
		я1чью
		я1чья
		я1ша
		я1шва
		я1шве
		я1шви
		я1шво
		я1шву
		я1швы
		я1ше
		я1ши
		я1шла
		я1шле
		я1шли
		я1шло
		я1шлу
		я1шлы
		я1шо
		я1шра
		я1шре
		я1шри
		я1шро
		я1шру
		я1шры
		я1шу
		я1шье
		я1шьи
		я1шью
		я1шья
		я1ща
		я1ще
		я1щи
		я1що
		я1щу
		я1щье
		я1щьи
		я1щью
		я1щья
		я1ы
		я1э
		я1ю
		я1я
	</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
